Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 1

General Provisions

4-12-101. Creation.

There is created a state museum for the purpose of bringing together the administration of the various collections of articles, specimens and relics owned by the state, to be under the supervision of, and administered by, the Douglas Henry state museum commission, established pursuant to chapter 20, part 3 of this title.

Acts 1937, ch. 285, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 2569.2 (Williams, § 2569.5); Acts 1959, ch. 154, § 1; 1971, ch. 388, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-1201; Acts 2009, ch. 497, § 2.

Cross-References. Abandoned cultural property, title 66, ch. 29, part 2.

Arts commission, §4-20-101.

4-12-102. Executive director and other employees — Museum fund.

The Douglas Henry state museum commission shall employ a museum executive director, and delegates its authority to the museum executive director to hire and manage experts and other employees as may be needed to properly care for and maintain the museum and to impart its educational value to the visiting public.

The museum executive director has the authority to assume charge of all collections and articles acquired, and to coordinate and display such articles in such manner as the museum executive director deems to the best interest of the general public.

The museum executive director also has the power to solicit and accept gifts and contributions on behalf of the state museum upon such terms and conditions and for such uses and purposes as may be consistent with state law.

The museum executive director shall install and maintain suitable containers for the collection of small cash donations to the state museum. The funds so collected shall be receipted and deposited as departmental revenue of the museum with the same budgetary and accounting controls as other funds of the museum. Expenditure of funds so collected shall be for the furtherance of the objectives of the museum's programs and shall be made under the same restrictions and controls as other expenditures of the museum.

The museum executive director may directly solicit funds on behalf of the museum, including, but not limited to, creating membership and sponsorship organizations and conducting annual giving campaigns.

There is established within the general fund a special agency account to be known as the museum fund for the purpose of furthering the objectives of the museum's programs. All funds collected pursuant to this subdivision (c)(3) must be deposited into the fund. No part of the fund reverts to the general fund, but shall be carried forward until expended in accordance with this chapter.

The fund must be administered by the museum executive director.

Expenditure of funds collected pursuant to this subdivision (c)(3) must be for the furtherance of the objectives of the museum's programs and must be made under the same restrictions and controls as other expenditures of the museum.

The museum executive director may create subfunds for funds raised with donor conditions upon their expenditure.

Prior to July 1, 2019, and prior to July 1 of each subsequent fiscal year, and to the extent necessary during the fiscal year, certifications must be made and delivered to the commissioner of finance and administration, who has final authority regarding the actual expenditures of the fund.

The museum executive director may promulgate rules in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title to effectuate the purposes of this subdivision (c)(3).

On or before July 31, 2019, and on or before July 31 of each subsequent fiscal year, the museum executive director must submit to the chairs of the finance, ways and means committees of the senate and the house of representatives, a report detailing the fundraising activities of the museum during the previous fiscal year.

Acts 1937, ch. 285, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 2569.3 (Williams, § 2569.6); Acts 1959, ch. 154, § 2; 1971, ch. 388, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-1202; Acts 1983, ch. 420, § 4; 2008, ch. 641, § 1; 2009, ch. 497, § 3; 2018, ch. 821, §§ 1-3; 2019, ch. 81, § 1.

Cross-References. Confidential information concerning state museum donors, §10-7-504.

Director of state museum may accept donations, §4-12-303.

4-12-103. Compensation of staff.

The museum executive director's compensation shall be determined by the Douglas Henry state museum commission in a manner consistent with the department of human resources' policies and standards.

Experts and such other assistants as may be employed under this chapter shall have their compensation determined by the museum executive director in a manner consistent with the department of human resources' policies and standards.

Acts 1937, ch. 285, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 2569.6 (Williams, § 2569.10); Acts 1959, ch. 154, § 3; 1971, ch. 388, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-1203; Acts 2009, ch. 497, § 4; 2018, ch. 821, § 4.

4-12-104. Location — When open.

The museum shall occupy space in Nashville at the James K. Polk State Office Building and Cultural Complex, on the ground floor of the south wing of the War Memorial Building, and at 1000 Rosa L. Parks Boulevard. All three (3) facilities shall be open on days and during hours as determined by the Douglas Henry state museum commission.

Acts 1937, ch. 285, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 2569.4 (Williams, § 2569.7); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 154, § 1; Acts 1971, ch. 388, § 4; 1972, ch. 485, § 1; 1977, ch. 402, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-1204; Acts 1991, ch. 213, § 2; 2018, ch. 821, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1991, ch. 213, § 1 provided that it is the intention of the general assembly that the Tennessee arts commission has the authority, but is not required, to close the state museum on Monday of each week.

4-12-105. Administration of other museums and exhibits.

In order to carry out this chapter, the World War Museum, previously administered by the adjutant general's office, the Civil War Exhibit, previously administered by the United Daughters of the Confederacy and Spanish-American War Exhibit, previously administered by the Spanish War Veterans, the Museum of Natural History, previously administered by the former game and fish commission, the Tennessee Archaeological Exhibit, the Tennessee Historical Exhibit and the relics and mementos of the World War II Commission are under the supervision of the state museum.

Any other exhibit in the possession of the state, or that may come into the possession of the state, shall be placed under this commission and administered under this chapter, this subsection (b) having especial reference to exhibits of the natural resources of the state.

The state museum is authorized and empowered to:

Enter into contracts, within the limits and funds available therefor, with individuals, organizations and institutions for services furthering the objectives of the museum's programs;

Provide advice and technical assistance, within the limits of funds available therefor, to the staff or board of directors or trustees of museums that are operated on state-owned property by entities other than the state; and

Make and sign any agreement and do and perform any acts that may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

Acts 1937, ch. 285, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 2569.5 (Williams, § 2569.8); modified; Acts 1959, ch. 154, § 4; 1971, ch. 388, § 5; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-1205; Acts 1991, ch. 213, §§ 4, 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1991, ch. 213, § 3 provided that it is the intention of the general assembly that the expertise and knowledge of the state museum should be shared with other museums operated by entities on property owned by the state; provided, that the operation, organization and supervision of the state museum shall not be changed by providing these services.

Cross-References. Agricultural museum, title 43, ch. 1, part 5.

Disposal of surplus property in collection of state museum, §12-2-409.

4-12-106. Appropriation — Other funds.

In order to establish, maintain and operate the state museum, five thousand dollars ($5,000) annually is appropriated out of the general funds of the state, which funds may be supplemented by any other sums for the museum, coming into the hands of the commission from any other source whatsoever.

Acts 1937, ch. 285, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 2569.7 (Williams, § 2569.9); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 154, § 1; Acts 1971, ch. 388, § 6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-1206.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

4-12-107. Future reorganization permitted.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a future reorganization that may be enacted to bring together all or any of the cultural activities of the state, including the historical commission, within a single department or division.

Acts 1971, ch. 388, § 7; T.C.A., § 4-1207.

4-12-108. Sales facilities authorized.

The state museum is hereby authorized to operate sales facilities in the state museum.

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent the operation of sales facilities in the state museum by any nonprofit corporation that has as its chief purpose the support of the programs of the state museum.

Acts 1975, ch. 291, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-1208; Acts 1991, ch. 213, § 7; 2018, ch. 821, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1991, ch. 213, § 6 provided that it is the intention of the general assembly that such private not-for-profit corporations as may, from time to time, exist to serve and further the programs of the Tennessee state museum, be allowed to operate sales facilities within the museum. To prevent confusion over the ownership of goods to be sold, the policies governing the sale of goods and the establishment of accurate operating costs, it is the further intention of the general assembly that should any such corporation desire to operate a gift shop or any other sort of sales facility presently operated by the state, the corporation must purchase the entire stock of the state-operated facility.

4-12-109. Items to be sold.

The facility authorized by §4-12-108 shall sell Tennessee produced items or items appropriate to the museum's programs, as approved by the museum executive director.

Acts 1975, ch. 291, § 2; T.C.A., § 4-1209; Acts 2018, ch. 821, § 7.

4-12-110. Use of profits — Earned revenue reserve fund established — Administration — Expenditures.

Any profits derived from sales facilities authorized by § 4-12-108 shall be used in the programs of the state museum.

There is established within the general fund a special agency account to be known as the earned revenue reserve fund for the purpose of assuring sufficient funding for the administration and programs of the state museum. All sales facilities revenue and other program fees collected shall be deposited into the fund. No part of the fund shall revert to the general fund, but shall be carried forward until expended in accordance with this chapter.

The fund shall be administered by the museum executive director.

For each fiscal year, there is allocated a sum sufficient from the fund to provide for the administrative and program costs of the state museum.

Prior to the start of each fiscal year, and to the extent necessary during the fiscal year, certifications shall be made and delivered to the commissioner of finance and administration who has final authority regarding the actual expenditures of the fund.

Acts 1975, ch. 291, § 3; T.C.A., § 4-1210; Acts 2018, ch. 821, § 8.

4-12-111. Fees or admission — Facilities for nonprofit groups.

The state museum is authorized to impose a fee or charge admission for special events or programs.

The amount of the fee or charge shall be determined by the Douglas Henry state museum commission, and proceeds from the fees or charges shall only be used by the commission to offset the cost of the special events or programs or other educational programs of the state museum.

[Deleted by 2018 amendment.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment.]

The state museum is authorized by this subsection (b) to have reduced fees or admission charges for any person who may have a disability, be an honorably discharged veteran of the United States armed forces, sixty-five (65) years of age or older, or a student in any school, grades kindergarten through twelve (K-12), for the special events or programs.

The state museum, in the discretion of the museum executive director, is further authorized to provide facilities, assistance and space to any nonprofit corporation that has as its principal purpose the support of the programs of the state museum and whose net proceeds are directed to benefit the programs or operation of the state museum. This cooperation and assistance may be provided regardless of whether the corporation charges a fee or imposes an admission charge to its programs.

Acts 1979, ch. 367, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-1211; Acts 2008, ch. 1128, § 1; 2009, ch. 497, § 5; 2011, ch. 47, § 2; 2018, ch. 821, §§ 9, 10.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 107 provided that nothing in the legislation shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of this legislation, which was July 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 108 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

4-12-112. Black history.

The state museum commission, acting upon the recommendation of the museum executive director, is hereby authorized to contract with the Beck Cultural Exchange Center, Knoxville, for either the appropriate deposit, display, examination, or preservation, or any of these, at the center of such items or collections of articles, specimens and relics owned by the state and administered by the commission, as may be deemed by the commission and by the center to be of special interest to the black citizens of this state.

The terms of any such contract shall ensure that adequate steps are undertaken to protect and preserve all such items for the benefit of future Tennesseans.

Acts 1983, ch. 245, § 2; 2018, ch. 821, § 11.

4-12-113. Confidentiality of information relating to candidates for position of museum executive director.

Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c), notwithstanding any law to the contrary, an application for a position of museum executive director, materials submitted with an application, letters of recommendation or references concerning an applicant, and any other records or information relating to or arising out of the process of searching for and selecting an individual for the position of museum executive director shall be treated as confidential and shall not be open for public inspection, if the records could be used to identify a candidate for the position.

After a search committee has selected candidates as finalists for the position of museum executive director, the committee shall publicly announce the finalists. The announcement must occur no later than fifteen (15) calendar days before the final vote of the Douglas Henry state museum commission to appoint or elect a person to fill the position of museum executive director. Records relating exclusively to the candidates selected as finalists are not confidential and shall be open for public inspection, except for a record otherwise confidential under state or federal law.

This section shall not apply to information relating to a candidate who did not expressly request that the candidate's information be kept confidential.

Meetings or portions of meetings devoted to discussing information deemed confidential pursuant to this section are exempt from title 8, chapter 44, part 1.

For the purposes of this section, “finalists” means those candidates selected by a search committee as the group to be recommended to the commission from which one (1) shall be appointed or elected museum executive director.

Acts 2017, ch. 200, § 1; 2018, ch. 821, § 12.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

4-12-114. Bill Haslam Center.

The building that houses the Tennessee state museum located at 1000 Rosa L. Parks Boulevard is designated as the “Bill Haslam Center”.

The state museum shall erect suitable markers or affix suitable signs designating the museum as the “Bill Haslam Center”. The state museum shall fund all costs related to the signage.

Acts 2020, ch. 800, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning Governor Haslam, see Acts 2020, ch. 800.